Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 5. Wyoming State Forestry Good Neighbor Authority Revolving Account

History.

2020 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 93, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 36-1-501.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Division” means the Wyoming state forestry division of the office of state lands and investments;

“Good neighbor authority” means an agreement between the division, the bureau of land management and the United States forest service to allow the state to perform forestry services on bureau of land management and forest service lands as specified in the agreement;

“Wyoming state forestry good neighbor authority revolving account” or “account” means the account created by W.S.

36-1-502

.

History.

2020 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 93, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 36-1-502.
Wyoming state forestry good neighbor authority revolving account; creation; investment of funds; authorized expenditures.

There is created the Wyoming state forestry good neighbor authority revolving account. The account shall include all legislative appropriations, federal funds, county funds, partner funds, funds generated from good neighbor authority projects or other federally funded cooperative forest management projects and all income from investments of monies in the account. If a contract is entered into pursuant to W.S. 36-1-503(a)(iii), funds in the account may be expanded on good neighbor authority projects prior to receipt of federal fund reimbursements. Funds deposited into the account are continuously appropriated to the state forester to be expended only as provided in this section. Unless otherwise specifically provided, appropriations to the account shall not lapse or revert at the end of any fiscal period.

Upon written approval of the state forester, expenditures shall be made out of the account for good neighbor authority projects or other cooperative forest management projects.

History.

2020 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 93, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 36-1-503.
Powers and duties of state forester.

The state forester shall:

Administer the account;

Ensure that all funds generated from good neighbor authority projects or other federally funded cooperative forest management projects are deposited in the account;

Enter into contracts on behalf of the division for good neighbor authority projects or other federally funded cooperative forest management projects funded through the account;

Adopt rules governing the administration of the account and to carry out the purposes of this article;

Have the authority to partner with one (1) or more counties on good neighbor authority projects or other cooperative forest management projects and disburse funds from the account for these purposes.

The state forester may hire additional employees as necessary to conduct good neighbor authority projects or other federally funded cooperative forest management projects funded through the account. Employees hired under this subsection shall be funded using federal funds deposited in the account. The state forester shall not fill more than one (1) full-time employee position and four (4) at-will employee contract positions under this subsection.

History.

2020 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 93, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.